Hawaii statutes.
§431:8-315 Tax on surplus lines. (a)
On or before March 15, 2011, each surplus lines broker shall pay to the
director of finance, through the commissioner, a premium tax on surplus lines
insurance transacted by the broker during 2010. On or before September 15,
2011, each surplus lines broker shall pay to the director of finance, through
the commissioner, a premium tax on surplus lines insurance transacted by the
broker after December 31, 2010, and before July 1, 2011. After
June 30, 2011, within forty-five days after the end of each calendar
quarter, each surplus lines broker shall pay to the director of finance,
through the commissioner, a premium tax on surplus lines insurance transacted
by the broker during the calendar quarter for insurance for which this State is
the home state of the insured. The tax rate shall be in the amount of 4.68 per
cent of gross premiums, less return premiums, on surplus lines insurance
allocated to this State. The tax rate and fees of other states shall be
applied to the gross premiums, less return premiums, allocated to those states.

As used in this subsection, "gross
premiums" means the amount of the policy or coverage premium charged by
the insurer in consideration for the insurance contract. Any charges for
policy, survey, inspection, service, or similar fees or other charges added by
the broker shall not be considered part of gross premiums.

(b) The commissioner shall collect the taxes
and fees on independently procured surplus lines insurance and from surplus lines
licensees and disburse to the other states the funds earned by each state;
provided that the other state has a reciprocal allocation and disbursement
procedure for the benefit of this State. To the extent that other states,
where portions of the properties, risks, or exposures reside, have failed to
establish a reciprocal allocation and disbursement procedure with this State,
the net premium tax collected shall be retained by this State.

(c) If a surplus lines policy covers risks or
exposures only partially resident in this State, the tax payable shall be
computed upon the proportion of the premium which is properly allocable to the
risks or exposures located in this State. The taxes and fees payable to this
State on policies that cover risks and exposures only partially resident in
this State shall be remitted on the quarterly schedule established by
subsection (a) to the home state of the insured for disbursement to this State.

(d) The tax on any portion of the premium
unearned at the termination of the insurance contract shall be returned to the
policyholder.

(e) The commissioner may:

(1) Enter into a cooperative agreement, reciprocal
agreement, or compact with other states to facilitate and provide for the
collection, allocation, and disbursement of premium taxes attributable to the
placement of surplus lines insurance;

(2) Provide for uniform methods of allocation and
reporting among surplus lines insurance risk classifications;

(3) Conform to the requirements of the federal
Nonadmitted and Reinsurance Reform Act of 2010;

(4) Share information among states relating to
surplus lines insurance premium taxes; and

(5) Utilize a method adopted in cooperation with
other states to allocate risk and compute the tax due on the portion of premium
attributable to each risk classification and to each state where properties,
risks, or exposures are located.

The commissioner shall assess the insured for the cost of
the cooperative agreement, reciprocal agreement, or compact to collect and
distribute the premium taxes. Upon application of the insured, the commissioner shall
refund the insured for excess payments of taxes received by the State that are
the result of the statewide tax rate. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L
2003, c 212, §48; am L 2006, c 154, §10; am L 2011, c 68, §13]

Revision Note

The paragraph defining "gross premiums" was moved
from subsection (b) to subsection (a) pursuant to §23G-15.

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next